Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 521. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 521.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this subtitle:

(1) "Child health plan program" means the programs established under Chapters 62 and 63, Health and Safety Code.

(2) "Commission" means the Health and Human Services Commission.

(3) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the commission.

(4) "Executive council" means the council established under Subchapter C, Chapter 523.

(5) "Health and human services agencies" includes the Department of State Health Services.

(6) "Health and human services system" means the system for providing or otherwise administering health and human services in this state by the commission, including through:

(A) an office or division of the commission; or

(B) another entity under the administrative and operational control of the executive commissioner.

(7) "Home telemonitoring service" means a health service that requires scheduled remote monitoring of data related to a patient's health and transmission of the data to a licensed home and community support services agency or hospital, as those terms are defined by Section 548.0251.

(8) "Medicaid" means the medical assistance program established under Chapter 32, Human Resources Code.

(9) "Medicaid managed care organization" means a managed care organization as defined by Section 540.0001 that contracts with the commission under Chapter 540 or 540A to provide health care services to Medicaid recipients.

(10) "Platform" means the technology, system, software, application, modality, or other method through which a health professional remotely interfaces with a patient when providing a health care service or procedure as a telemedicine medical service, teledentistry dental service, or telehealth service.

(11) "Section 1915(c) waiver program" means a federally funded state Medicaid program authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396n(c)).

(12) "Teledentistry dental service," "telehealth service," and "telemedicine medical service" have the meanings assigned by Section 111.001, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 521.0002. REFERENCES IN LAW MEANING COMMISSION OR COMMISSION DIVISION. (a) This section applies notwithstanding Section 521.0001(5).

(b) A reference in any law to any of the following state agencies or entities in relation to a function transferred to the commission under Section 531.0201, 531.02011, or 531.02012, as those sections existed immediately before their expiration on September 1, 2023, means the commission or the division of the commission performing the function previously performed by the state agency or entity before the transfer, as appropriate:

(1) health and human services agency;

(2) the Department of State Health Services;

(3) the Department of Aging and Disability Services;

(4) subject to Chapter 316 (H.B. 5), Acts of the 85th Legislature, Regular Session, 2017, the Department of Family and Protective Services; or

(5) the Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a reference in any law to any of the following state agencies or entities in relation to a function transferred to the commission under Section 531.0201, 531.02011, or 531.02012, as those sections existed immediately before their expiration on September 1, 2023, from the state agency that assumed the relevant function in accordance with Chapter 198 (H.B. 2292), Acts of the 78th Legislature, Regular Session, 2003, means the commission or the division of the commission performing the function previously performed by the agency that assumed the function before the transfer, as appropriate:

(1) the Texas Department on Aging;

(2) the Texas Commission on Alcohol and Drug Abuse;

(3) the Texas Commission for the Blind;

(4) the Texas Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing;

(5) the Texas Department of Health;

(6) the Texas Department of Human Services;

(7) the Texas Department of Mental Health and Mental Retardation;

(8) the Texas Rehabilitation Commission;

(9) the Texas Health Care Information Council; or

(10) the Interagency Council on Early Childhood Intervention.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law and subject to Chapter 316 (H.B. 5), Acts of the 85th Legislature, Regular Session, 2017, a reference in any law to the Department of Protective and Regulatory Services in relation to a function transferred under Section 531.0201, 531.02011, or 531.02012, as those sections existed immediately before their expiration on September 1, 2023, from the Department of Family and Protective Services means the commission or the division of the commission performing the function previously performed by the Department of Family and Protective Services before the transfer.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 521.0003. REFERENCES IN LAW MEANING EXECUTIVE COMMISSIONER, EXECUTIVE COMMISSIONER'S DESIGNEE, OR DIVISION DIRECTOR. (a) A reference in any law to any of the following persons in relation to a function transferred to the commission under Section 531.0201, 531.02011, or 531.02012, as those sections existed immediately before their expiration on September 1, 2023, means the executive commissioner, the executive commissioner's designee, or the director of the commission division performing the function previously performed by the state agency from which the function was transferred and that the person represented, as appropriate:

(1) the commissioner of aging and disability services;

(2) the commissioner of assistive and rehabilitative services;

(3) the commissioner of state health services; or

(4) subject to Chapter 316 (H.B. 5), Acts of the 85th Legislature, Regular Session, 2017, the commissioner of the Department of Family and Protective Services.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law and subject to Chapter 316 (H.B. 5), Acts of the 85th Legislature, Regular Session, 2017, a reference in any law to any of the following persons or entities in relation to a function transferred to the commission under Section 531.0201, 531.02011, or 531.02012, as those sections existed immediately before their expiration on September 1, 2023, from the state agency that assumed or continued to perform the function in accordance with Chapter 198 (H.B. 2292), Acts of the 78th Legislature, Regular Session, 2003, means the executive commissioner or the director of the commission division performing the function performed before the enactment of Chapter 198 (H.B. 2292) by the state agency that was abolished or renamed by Chapter 198 (H.B. 2292) and that the person or entity represented:

(1) an executive director or other chief administrative officer of a state agency listed in Section 521.0002(c) or of the Department of Protective and Regulatory Services; or

(2) the governing body of a state agency listed in Section 521.0002(c) or of the Department of Protective and Regulatory Services.

(c) A reference to any of the following councils means the executive commissioner or the executive commissioner's designee, as appropriate, and a function of any of the following councils is a function of that appropriate person:

(1) the Health and Human Services Council;

(2) the Aging and Disability Services Council;

(3) the Assistive and Rehabilitative Services Council;

(4) subject to Chapter 316 (H.B. 5), Acts of the 85th Legislature, Regular Session, 2017, the Family and Protective Services Council; or

(5) the State Health Services Council.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 521.0004. REFERENCES IN LAW TO PROVISIONS DERIVED FROM FORMER CHAPTER 531. A reference in any law to "revised provisions derived from Chapter 531, as that chapter existed on March 31, 2025," is a reference to the following:

(1) Sections 532.0051, 532.0052, 532.0053, 532.0054, 532.0055, 532.0057, 532.0058, 532.0059, 532.0060, 532.0061, and 540.0051;

(2) Subchapters B, C, D, E, F, G, H, I, and J, Chapter 532, Subchapters A, B, C, D, E, F, G, H, and I, Chapter 548, and Subchapters D, D-1, and E, Chapter 550; and

(3) this chapter and Chapters 522, 523, 524, 525, 526, 544, 545, 546, 547, and 549.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.